Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3414
Incapacity of principal; attorney in fact; duties.

Promptly upon being notified that a determination that the principal is incapable of making health care decisions has or is about to be made, the attorney in fact, if other than the principal's most proximate next of kin and if the principal has not directed otherwise, shall notify the most proximate next of kin and the court-appointed guardian of the principal, if any. The order of notification shall be: (1) The spouse; (2) an adult child; (3) either parent; (4) an adult brother or sister; and (5) the next closest kin.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 14.